California, session 20252026, SB1326.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21074 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:21074. (a) “Tribal cultural resources” include any of the following:(1) A site, feature, place, cultural landscape, sacred place, including a sanctified cemetery, cemetery, or burial area of a California Native American tribe, or object with cultural value to a California Native American tribe that is any of the following:(A) Included or eligible for inclusion in the California Register of Historical Resources or the National Register of Historical Places.(B) Included in a local register of historical resources as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 5020.1.(C) Identified by the Native American Heritage Commission as a sacred place pursuant to Section 5097.94 or 5097.96.(D) Included in a local tribal register. register and provided to the lead agency by a consulting California Native American tribe.(2) A cultural landscape that meets the criteria of paragraph (1) to the extent that the landscape is geographically defined in terms of the size and scope of the landscape.(3) A historical resource described in Section 21084.1, a unique archaeological resource as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 21083.2, or a “nonunique archaeological resource” as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 21083.2 that conforms with the criteria of paragraph (1).(4) A resource determined by the lead agency to be significant pursuant to criteria set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 5024.1.(b) Tribal cultural resources are a separate category from cultural resources and archaeological resources, and certain archaeological methods and standards may not be appropriate for identifying tribal cultural resources. If the lead agency elects not to use archaeological methods and standards are used in the identification of tribal cultural resources instead of tribal methods and standards or tribal traditional knowledge to identify tribal cultural resources, it submitted by a California Native American tribe during tribal consultation, the lead agency shall explain its decision, supported by substantial evidence, in the environmental documents for the project.SEC. 2. Section 21084.3 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:21084.3. (a) Public agencies shall, when feasible, avoid damaging effects to any tribal cultural resource.(b) If the lead agency determines that a project may cause a substantial adverse change to a tribal cultural resource, and measures are not otherwise identified in the consultation process provided in Section 21080.3.2, the lead agency shall shall, when feasible, adopt mitigation measures to avoid or minimize the significant adverse impacts, which impacts. Those mitigation measures may include, but are not limited to, any of the following: following examples:(1) Avoidance and preservation of the resource in place, including, but not limited to, planning and construction to avoid the resource and protect the cultural and natural context, or planning greenspace, parks, or other open space, to incorporate the resource with culturally appropriate protection and management criteria.(2) Treating the resource with culturally appropriate dignity taking into account the tribal cultural values and meaning of the resource, including, but not limited to, the following:(A) Protecting the cultural character and integrity of the resource.(B) Protecting the traditional use of the resource.(C) Protecting the confidentiality of the resource.(3) Permanent conservation easements or other interests in real property, with culturally appropriate management criteria for the purposes of preserving or utilizing the resource or place.(4) Reburying or relocating the resource on the project property in a location that will be protected from further disturbance or harm in perpetuity.(5) Relinquishing the resource to the consulting California Native American tribe.(6) Providing the consulting California Native American tribe access to the resource for purposes of cultural practices, continued heritage teachings, stewardship, or comanagement comanagement, as defined in Section 11019.82 of the Government Code, of lands.(c) Avoidance and preservation of the tribal cultural resource in place shall be considered when requested by the consulting California Native American tribe. If avoidance and preservation of the resource in place are determined to not be feasible, the lead agency shall demonstrate and document the basis for that determination with substantial evidence and incorporate other and, when feasible, adopt mitigation measures to avoid or minimize significant adverse impacts to the resource consistent with this division.(d) The consulting California Native American tribe may identify culturally appropriate mitigation measures, which the lead agency shall consider and incorporate, to the extent feasible, in developing mitigation and treatment measures.(e) Curation of a tribal cultural resource at private or public repository facilities may only occur if agreed upon by the consulting California Native American tribe and any curation may be subject to federal and state repatriation laws and repository fees.(f) Tribal cultural resources are a separate category from cultural resources and archaeological resources, and certain archaeological methods and standards may not be appropriate for treatment and mitigation of tribal cultural resources. If the lead agency elects not to use tribal methods and standards or tribal traditional knowledge in the adoption of avoidance, mitigation, and treatment measures for tribal cultural resources, it treatment and mitigation measures preferred and submitted by a California Native American tribe during tribal consultation are not recommended for adoption by the lead agency, the lead agency shall explain its decision, supported by substantial evidence, in the environmental documents for the project.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.